Maine, session 132, LD412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2915-A is enacted to read:
§2915-A. Sale of self-administered sexual assault forensic evidence collection kit
prohibited
1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. "Person" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 206, subsection 2.
B. "Self-administered sexual assault forensic evidence collection kit" means materials
advertised or marketed as a means for a person other than a licensed hospital or licensed
health care practitioner to collect physical evidence of a sexual assault.
C. "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in section 2915, subsection 3-A.
2. Prohibition. A person may not sell or offer for sale a self-administered sexual
assault forensic evidence collection kit.
3. Admissibility. This section does not affect the admissibility in a court proceeding
of evidence collected using a self-administered sexual assault forensic evidence collection
kit.
4. Violation. There is a rebuttable presumption that a violation of this section is a
violation of the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act.
Page 1 - 132LR0873(03)